


Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Manage IT assets with Freshservice









































IT Asset Management Software
Maintain inventory of your IT and non-IT assets and track details throughout its lifecycle. Sign up for free
 











Try Freshservice free for 30 days







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 



















Get a free demo of Freshservice







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





No.of agents





Phone No.
















Everything you need to take control of your assets





CMDB


Asset Overview


Asset Mapping


















































Everything you need to take control of your assets


CMDB
View all the assets and contracts used by the organization in a single pane, and see details like its type, location, and the person or department using it.



Asset Overview
View all details of an asset’s lifecycle – from acquisition to expiry. Get context about its usage and plan future asset purchases.



Asset Mapping
Visualize dependencies and relationships with asset relationship map view.










Freshservice features to enhance your service delivery




Incident Management
Resolve tickets raised via email, self-service portal, phone, or in person. Track, prioritize, assign, and automate resolution processes to drive efficiency.





Service Catalog
Offer multiple services for various departments with the service catalog so users can place and receive requests in no time.





Knowledge Base
Create solutions for your incidents, automatically convert it to knowledge base articles, and improve productivity by responding to similar requests with canned responses.





Reporting
Identify bottlenecks, make informed decisions, monitor service desk performance, and improve service delivery with predefined and custom reporting capabilities.





Integrations
Make work simpler with popular third-party integrations and customizable plugins so you can manage services from the single window of your Freshservice account.





Gamification
Integrated game mechanics transforms the service desk to a game and makes work fun by motivating agents with rewards for tasks.




Sign up for freeRequest Demo 


The Freshservice impact on our customers
















““If another organization is frustrated with their current ITSM tool and wants a breath of fresh air, then Freshservice is there ready and waiting.””



          Adam Le Feuvre
        
Project Manager
M&C Saatchi



















“We’ve seen infinite improvements in our service desk with Freshservice. Being an evidence-based business, Freshservice helps us drive intelligent decisions by letting us track data.”



          Tom Peach-Geraghty
        
Head of IT Operations
Unidays



















“Freshservice has helped us improve our ability to serve to requests or queries in an elegant and professional manner. The portal experience is very good.”



          Karthikeyan Rammohan
        
Manager of People Operations
Flipkart



















“Veeva's teams are able to resolve issues in less than 4 hours with more visibility into end-users’ issues in Freshservice.”



          Prasad Ramakrishnan
        
Chief Information Officer
Veeva Systems



















“I was surprised at the speed of implementation, Freshservice was available the next day and ready to use in under a week.”



          Craig Bell
        
IT Service Director
Cordant





























Trusted by over 10,000 customers

















































































































Try Freshservice free for 30 days


Sign up with google
or




Please confirm your company and service desk domain ID








First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 































Cloud Service Desk Software  | Freshservice


















































Freshworks















Cloud Service Desk Software
Online IT solution better than On-premise
Seamlessly integrate and store everything on cloud
GET STARTED FOR FREE

 


Something better than On-premise software.. 
Wary of hosting servers and switching between multiple tools in different locations? You need something reliable to provide reliable data and automated workflows. Here is where cloud service desk software has filled a void. More and more enterprises have started opting for cloud based software over on-premise versions.








Why Choose Cloud service desk software over On-Premise

No or limited capital expenditure
Multiple locations with server on the cloud

Easy configuration and customization
Scalable and systematic workflow
Automated service desk
No worries about storage limits





Why you need Freshservice cloud service desk?
Freshservice SaaS helps you save you thousands of dollars which might be going down the drain with your current or almost non-existent help desk. 
Flexible cloud-based ITSM
Embed Freshservice’s one-touch service on your Android or iOS smartphone and use your cloud based service desk on the go. Add as many agents you require; assign tasks, monitor your agents and CI in just a few clicks. Get unlimited storage on the cloud with no hardware restrictions to boggle you down. 
Multichannel & Go mobile
Access and maintain your help desk from anywhere. You can use your SaaS service desk through different portals without any hiccups. You don’t have to rely on hosted servers or different integrations or applications to get your work running. You can even keep your data secure with periodic backups . 
Cost effective
Freshservice is cost effective, simple and efficient to use. You don’t have to invest in hosting, installing, configuration or any kind of infrastructure. Everything is available on the cloud. Save your valuable time and resources when you use Freshservice; eliminate all the unnecessary things your incompetent service desk makes you do.
Know more about Freshservice Service Desk Software


Need more reasons?? Check out Freshservice ITSM Features

IT Trouble Ticketing Software


IT Service Request Management Tool



IT Asset Management Software


IT Financial Management



ITIL Configuration Management


Service Desk Automation





Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds

Try Freshservice Now













Freshservice Integrations | Integrate your ITIL Service Desk with tools you are already using!









































Integrate with other apps you use and love
Freshservice fits right into your existing business ecosystem with integrations available for popular business apps. 
Sign up for free

 



Native Integrations














Atlassian JIRA

Map bugs to tasks and tickets from inside Freshservice

Learn more

















Rescue

Share users' screens instantly, and solve problems in real time

Learn more

















FreshBooks

Track time on tasks and tickets, plus get the option of invoicing

Learn more

















G Suite

Sign into your service desk directly from Google Apps with Single Sign On

Learn more

















Harvest

Time tracking and invoicing options in your service desk

Learn more

















SurveyMonkey

Enhance your customer support with meaningful feedback

Learn more

















Zapier

Easy to bridge the gap between your service desk and different applications

Learn more

















Dropbox

Send large files and attachments easily

Learn more

















Bomgar

Provide remote desktop assistance with screen-sharing and secure web-based live chat support

Learn more

















SCCM

Advanced asset discovery module to sync your inventories with the service desk 

Learn more

















Box

Share large files and documents from your service desk 

Learn more

















Amazon web services

Import virtual assets right from cloud storage EC2, RDS and EBS directly to your CMDB

Learn more

















Pagerduty

Incident management system to monitor, schedule and create alerts for all your tickets

Learn more

















Cloudwatch

Convert AWS CloudWatch alarms to tickets and alarm notifications to ticket notes

Learn more

















Quickbooks

Send time spent on tickets to QuickBooks for easy billing

Learn more

















ClearGraph

Interactive real-time reports with custom dashboards

Learn more

















DocuSign

Send contracts for online e-signature and approval from your service desk

Learn more

















Slack

Get alerts and resolve issues right from Slack channels

Learn more

















Office 365

Schedule and sync Freshservice events to your Office 365 Calendar

Learn more

















Salesforce

Import your Salesforce contact information straight into Freshservice

Learn more

















Yammer

Automatically convert your Yammer newsfeed into tickets within your service desk

Learn more

















WorkflowMax

Log time spent on your Freshservice tickets in your WorkflowMax jobs and tasks

Learn more

















Workday

Easily enter new data and create service requests to onboard new employees

Learn more









Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds
Start your 30-day free trial. No credit card required. No strings attached. 
Sign up for free

 
























Freshservice Pricing Plans | Enterprise ITSM Solution at $0









































Refreshing service management at $0
Enjoy free 30-day Estate trial and free forever on Sprout 




MONTHLY



Save upto 20%

YEARLY







SPROUT
For getting started




                    FREE
                

up to 3 agents and 100 assets




100 End UsersIncident ManagementSelf-service PortalKnowledge BaseAsset ManagementAD Integration 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






BLOSSOM
Perfect for small teams




$
29


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Sprout and…

Unlimited End UsersStandard ReportsMultiple Help Desk EmailsCustom Domain MappingTime Tracking  




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details








GARDEN
Ideal for growing teams




$
49


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Blossom and…

Change, Problem, & Release ManagementMultiple SLAsPriority MatrixScheduled ReportsCustom Roles 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






ESTATE
Best value for large teams




$
79


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Garden and…

Service CatalogEnterprise ReportsProject ManagementEnterprise Security - Custom SSL & Trusted IPContract Management 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details









24 x 7 email support and 24 x 5 phone support included with all plans
Can’t decide which plan is right for you? 
See our complete feature comparison












Day Passes
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Need extra support help for a product launch or other spike? Day Passes make it easy for you to add extra agents temporarily when you need them. Just add them as occasional agents, buy a few Day Passes, and let them use a day pass for each day they need to access your support.
Read more 









Frequently Asked Questions

How does the 30-day free trial work?After you sign up, you get free unrestricted access to all the features available in Freshservice for 30 days. Thereafter, you can upgrade to a suitable plan.Is my data safe?We take security seriously. Our servers are hosted in a world class data center that is protected by biometric locks and 24-hour surveillance. We ensure that our application is always up to date with the latest security patches. Our data center is EU-US privacy shield compliant and all Freshservice plans include SSL encryption to keep your data safe.Do you have any contracts or cancellation fees?No. We do not have contracts or cancellation fees. You can cancel whenever you want and you will only be billed for that particular month.What types of payment do you accept?We accept Visa, Mastercard, Discover, American Express, and also PayPal. For annual contracts, we accept checks and online transfers in USD, EUR, GBP currencies.Can I upgrade or downgrade anytime?Yes. Freshservice offers a pay-as-you-go service, and you can upgrade, downgrade or cancel at any time. To change your plan, visit 'Plans & Billing' in your Freshservice account.Do you offer any discounts?Yes. Freshservice offers discounts to non-profit organizations, educational institutions and large teams. Contact support@freshservice.com for personalized pricing. Who is an agent? Can I add an agent on short term basis?In Freshservice, an agent can either be full-time or occasional, depending on your requirement. A full-time agent is someone who is part of your core service desk team. An occasional agent is someone who requires access to the service desk only on need-to basis. By default, Freshservice offers 3 free Day Passes at the time of sign up. For adding more occasional agents, you can purchase Day Passes starting from $1. Anybody can be added as an occasional agent, and the admin can define their role and scope of access to the service desk portal.Can I buy features as add-ons? Only some features are available for purchase as add-ons at the moment. Contact support@freshservice.com about customized plans. Have any other questions?If you have questions about Freshservice or the sign up process, please email us at support@freshservice.com and we will be glad to answer all your questions. 






Get Freshservice for iOS and Android
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Freshservice's mobile apps have been thoughtfully designed to help your team stay in touch with users, even when they're not at their desks. With the iOS and Android apps, your team can stay on top of incoming tickets, collaborate with other agents, and respond to issues on the go.






































1832 Asset Management L.P.























1832 Asset Management, L.P.









Home
Retail
Institutional
Private Client







 1832 Asset
          	Management L.P. 
1832 Asset Management L.P. ("1832 AM L.P.") is one of Canada's largest asset managers with over $100 billion in assets under management on behalf of retail, institutional and private client investors. 1832 AM L.P.'s award-winning investment management team is active across capital markets and asset classes deploying traditional and innovative strategies to deliver investment excellence for Dynamic Funds, ScotiaFunds and a range of international investment mandates.




 Investment Funds – Retail 
1832 AM L.P.'s retail mutual fund business is represented by the Dynamic Funds and ScotiaFunds brands. Dynamic Funds are primarily distributed by third party broker-dealers, while ScotiaFunds are most widely distributed through the Scotiabank branch network across Canada.
 




 Institutional 
Scotia Institutional Asset Management provides progressive and innovative solutions to institutional clients, including pension funds, non-profits, foundations and corporations. Recognizing that our clients' needs are often unique and complex, we offer specific and relevant solutions in traditional and alternative strategies designed to optimize investment success.
With the strength and access to Scotiabank's global expertise combined with our extensive experience across all asset classes, we have the foresight and confidence to plan and innovate through a changing environment. In doing so, we put capital to work in more progressive solutions. Scotia Institutional operates with the clear goal of generating results for our clients thereby forming deep and valued relationships.





 Private Client 
The Scotia Wealth Management Private Investment Counsel business delivers relevant solutions and tailored service for clients looking to delegate day-to-day investment decisions to an experienced team with a disciplined investment philosophy.
In addition, the 1832 Asset Management L.P. private client business maintains a focus on servicing the financial and asset management needs of charitable foundations, small institutions and private clients who have accumulated significant wealth, helping clients build and preserve wealth through innovative, high-quality investment management and financial advice.
 

 
 






×
Legal Notices


Terms of Use
The terms of use provided below apply to the 1832 Asset Management L.P. (1832AM) website (the "Website") and to all products, services, resources, information, materials and other content available on the Website. 
By accessing and using this Website you acknowledge that you have read, understood, and agree to accept and be bound by the terms of the Legal Notices set out below.  We may modify these Terms at any time without prior notice, by posting any changes on this Website. Your continued access or use of the services provided by this Website will mean you accept the terms of the Legal Notices including any changes made to them. If you do not accept any of the terms below, please discontinue use of this Website and any of its associated pages. This Website and its terms are governed by the laws applicable in the Province of Ontario, Canada. All disputes arising from these terms must be resolved exclusively by the courts of the Province of Ontario.
This Website does not constitute an offer or solicitation by anyone in the United States or any other jurisdiction in which such an offer or solicitation is not authorized or to any person to whom it is unlawful to make such an offer or solicitation. The Products described on this site are qualified for sale only to residents of Canada through registered investment advisors. Prospective investors who are NOT residents in Canada should consult with their advisor.
No Investment Advice
Views expressed regarding a particular company, security, industry or market sector should not be considered an indication of trading intent of any funds managed by 1832AM. These views are not to be considered as investment advice nor should they be considered a recommendation to buy or sell.

The contents of this Website are provided for informational and educational purposes and do not constitute specific advice regarding your personal investment situation or provide specific individual advice about investment, financial, legal, accounting, tax or similar matters. The information on this Website is subject to change without notice and 1832AM will not be held liable for any inaccuracies in the information provided.  Please contact your own personal advisor on your particular circumstances.
No Warranties or Liability
All information is provided “as is” without any warranties of any kind and 1832AM and its affiliates and their respective officers, directors, employees or agents make no representations and disclaim all express and implied warranties of any kind, including, without limitation, representations, warranties or conditions regarding accuracy, timeliness, completeness, non-infringement, merchantability or fitness for any particular purpose and 1832AM assumes no responsibility to you or any third party for the consequences of any errors or omissions.
1832AM is not responsible in any way for any damages (direct, indirect, special, incidental, economic, or consequential, exemplary or punitive) in respect of or in connection with the use or inability to use this Website, the information, or any action or decision made by you or anyone else in reliance on the website or the information, or any unauthorized use or reproduction of the website or the information.
Information collected
When you visit this website, the following information may be recorded: your IP address, pages visited, content downloaded and cookies. A cookie is a piece of information about an Internet session that may be created when a visitor accesses a website and which is used to identify you and store certain information.  1832AM uses this information to provide a more customized user experience and to help us understand the number of people that visit this website and which sections of the Website are visited most frequently. This information may be used to determine which information is most useful, improve this website and to provide better customer service.
Internet Email
E-mail over the internet is not a secure medium and privacy cannot be assured. E-mail communication is not confidential, subject to possible interception or loss, and is also subject to possible alteration. Neither 1832AM nor its affiliates are responsible for and will not be liable to you or anyone else for any harm or damages in connection with an e-mail containing personal or confidential information sent by you to 1832AM or an e-mail by 1832AM to you at your request.
Third Party Links
Links to other websites and references to third parties' goods or services are not endorsements or approval of such sites, goods or services, and are meant for convenience only. Linking to another website is at your sole risk and 1832AM will not be held responsible or liable for any damages in connection with linking to such third-party websites. 1832AM shall not be responsible or liable for any damages incurred to computer equipment or other types of equipment used nor for viruses that may infect the former due to the access and use of this website or the downloading of any document or materials of this website.
Trademarks and Copyrights
The content of this Website is protected by applicable copyright laws. Information is provided for your personal, non-commercial use only and may be used and reproduced provided that it is not modified and that you maintain all copyright and other notices contained in the Website. Unauthorized downloading, re-transmission, storage in any medium, copying, redistribution, reproduction, or republication for any purpose is strictly prohibited.
Certain names, phrases, logos, graphics or designs or on this Website constitute trade names and registered/unregistered trademarks (collectively, the "trademarks") of their owner and its affiliates or of third parties and are used under license by us.
Errors and Omissions
1832AM may change or update the information contained in this website without notice including changes or modifications relative to the products described herein. This website may contain certain grammatical errors as well as technical discrepancies.









×
Privacy Policy


1832 Asset Management L.P (1832AM), is committed to providing investors with the highest standard of service. As part of our commitment, we strive to protect your privacy and the confidentiality of personal information that you provide to us. Our information handling practices comply with applicable privacy laws.
The following is a description of our privacy policy regarding the collection, use and disclosure of personal information that you provide to us or that is shared with us from other sources. For your convenience, our Privacy Policy is set out in a question and answer format: 

What is Personal Information and Why Do We Need it?
How Do We Obtain Your Personal Information?
How Do We Use Your Personal Information?
With Whom is Your Personal Information Shared?
Where is Your Personal Information Kept?
How is Your Information Protected?
What Privacy Rights Do You Have?
Who Do You Contact About Privacy Concerns?

1. What is Personal Information and Why Do We Need it?
Personal information refers to information that identifies you. It may include information such as your age, marital status, employment history, social insurance number, credit history, home address, personal email address and home telephone number. 
We require your personal information in order to establish a relationship with you and provide you with the best possible service. Your signature, financial history, current financial position, social insurance number, age and other similar personal information allow us to: 

establish your identity; 
assess your eligibility for our investment products and services; 
continue to offer you the full range of products and services that we believe meet your changing needs; and 
protect you and us from error and fraud. 


In addition, we require your personal information in order to allow us to meet regulatory or contractual requirements relating to the products and services provided to you. 
2. How Do We Obtain Your Personal Information?
Personal information is received by us from you or from your representative with your consent. Other sources from which we may receive your information with your consent include, but are not limited to, our affiliates and other financial institutions, etc. 
3. How Do We Use Your Personal Information?
We may use your personal information for the following purposes: 

To identify you; 
To ensure our records are accurate;
To establish and administer your account;
To execute your transactions;
To maintain, store, record and determine your account holdings and transaction records; 
To verify previously given information when necessary; 
To provide you and your representatives with account statements/information; 
To provide you with financial statements, tax receipts, proxy mailings, transaction confirmations and other information that may be requested or needed to service your account;
To provide you with quality customer service and support on your investment needs; 
To develop and offer additional products and services that we feel may be of interest to you; 
To protect the interests of 1832AM, such as relates to the collection of debt owed; and 
To meet legal and regulatory requirements. 

4. With Whom is Your Personal Information Shared?
We are not in the business of selling or distributing our client's personal information to others. Client confidentiality and privacy remains one of our fundamental principles. However, we may share your information with others outside 1832AM in limited circumstances including:

Third Party Service Providers. We hire third party service providers to perform services on your behalf. We provide them with a limited amount of information in order that they may provide services including, but not limited to, data processing, the preparation and mailing of client statements, document storage, and imaging. They are prohibited from using the information for purposes other than to carry out the services they have been engaged to provide. These third party suppliers are not permitted to disclose this information to others. 
Your financial advisor. We share your information with your financial advisor and the dealer with which she or he is registered. We may also have to contact other financial institutions or mutual fund companies in order to gather complete information necessary to properly service your account with us.
As Permitted or Required By Law. 1832AM is compelled to disclose personal information in response to a law, regulation, court order, subpoena, valid demand, search warrant or other legally valid request or enquiry. We may also disclose information to our accountants, auditors, agents and lawyers in connection with the enforcement or protection of our legal rights.
Business Re-Organization. As we continue to grow, we may in the future re-organize or streamline parts of our operations. Since our business is based on our client relationships, we may disclose personal information to a third party in connection with an amalgamation, re-organization, transfer or financing of parts of our business. These third parties are not permitted to disclose this information to others. 

5. Where is Your Personal Information Kept?
Your personal information may be kept in electronic, microfilm or paper format at the offices of 1832AM, its affiliates or its third-party service providers. Your information may also be kept in secure off-site storage facilities.
6. How is Your Information Protected?
Policies, procedures, guidelines, and safeguards have been put in place to ensure your personal information is protected. Our employees and service providers have access to your personal information to enable them to perform their duties in servicing you. Personal information collected from you will only be used for the identified purposes and will be retained for as long as is necessary to fulfill the service or as required by law. 
We regard confidentiality and privacy as a cornerstone to our business. As such, our internal code of ethics requires all employees of 1832AM to maintain client confidentiality. Each year, our employees receive a current copy of our code of ethics and are required to certify in writing that they will comply with it.
7. What Privacy Rights Do You Have?
Upon request, we will provide you with access to your personal information. In addition, we may provide you with a list of third parties to whom your personal information was provided. If you wish to change or update your personal information, you may request to do so at any time. Please note that we may only alter that personal information required to fulfill the stated purposes. In certain circumstances, we may not be able to provide you with access to specific pieces of information. For example, (i) information containing references to other persons; (ii) information containing proprietary information confidential to 1832AM or its affiliates; (iii) information that has been destroyed or may be too costly to retrieve. 
You may withdraw your consent for the use of your personal information by contacting 1832AM at any time subject to reasonable notice. Legal and other requirements may prevent you from withdrawing consent and your decision to withdraw personal information may also limit the services or products we are able to provide to you.
8. Who Do You Contact About Privacy Concerns?
Should you have a complaint, please contact: 
Toll Free (800) 268-8186
Telephone (514) 908-3212 (English) or (514) 908-3217 (French)
Fax (514) 940-3511 or (800) 419-5119
For email inquiries, please contact privacy@1832.ca
If, after speaking with our Customer Relations Center, you wish to speak with our Privacy Officer you should call 1-866-977-0477. 
We reserve the right to change or remove this privacy policy at our discretion. If we decide to change it, we will post those changes here. We encourage you to visit this area frequently to stay informed. If you access our web site after we have posted changes to this policy, you are agreeing to accept the changes.





















 















                    1832 Asset Management L.P. Legal | Scotiabank
  





Select a main site category.

Personal BankingBusinessAbout Scotiabank 





Skip to page navigation Skip to main content.

 More Scotiabank Sites

 More Scotiabank Sites menu opened. Skip to  Scotia OnLine. 
Scotiabank Global Site


Anguilla
Antigua & Barbuda
Aruba
Australia
Bahamas
Barbados
Belize
Bonaire
Brazil
British Virgin Is.
Canada - English
Canada - French
Cayman Islands
Chile
Colombia
China
Costa Rica
Cuba
Curaçao
Dominica


Dom. Republic
El Salvador
France
Grenada
Guyana

Hong Kong
India
Ireland
Jamaica
Japan
Republic of Korea
Malaysia
Mexico

Nicaragua
Panama
Peru
Puerto Rico
Singapore
St. Eustatius
St. Kitts & Nevis


St. Lucia
St. Maarten
St Vincent & the Grenadines
Trinidad & Tobago
Turks & Caicos
U.S.A
US Virgin Islands
United Kingdom
Uruguay
Venezuela




Global Banking & Markets
ScotiaFunds
ScotiaMocatta
ScotiaWaterous
Get Growing for Business
Newcomers to Canada


Scotia Wealth Management
Scotia iTRADE
Global Transaction Banking
Roynat
HollisWealth


End of More Scotiabank Sites menu. 




AdChoices 

Français



  Default text size.  
  Larger text size.  
  Largest text size.  

 










   
 SIGN IN 







 
        to
        Select a site to sign in

ScotiaConnect
Scotia OnLine
TRADEXPRESS elite Plus
TRADEXPRESS
ScotiaFX
Stucky Net
Tax Payment & Filing



 New to Scotia OnLine? Activate Now 




Try our Online Simulator
Online Security Guarantee



 



Service Menu.
  Open Navigation 

 Contact Us

Let us Help
 "Contact" menu opened. Resources

Commercial Banking
            Specialist Locator
Business Service
            Centres
 Agricultural 
            Banking Centres

End of "Contact" menu. 

 Bank With Us

 Comprehensive banking services 
 "Bank with us" menu opened.
Manage, move and monitor your money.

 e-Banking 
ScotiaConnect Electronic Banking
Electronic Daily Statement
TRADEXPRESS elite Service


 Resources 
Business Fees & Interest Schedules

End of "Bank with us" menu. 

 InterAction

 Business Journal 
  
  Search the Scotia Bank website.     







Navigation Menu.

  Banking & Investing
    



Banking & Investing menu opened.
Skip menu. 


Products

Operating Accounts
Investing Accounts
Money Market Instruments



Services

Cash Management Services
Scotia Institutional Asset Management

 
InterAction 
          e-newsletter
Innovations in business banking.
Subscribe now 
End of About Us menu.


  Financing
    



Financing menu opened.
Skip menu. 


Lines of Credit & Loans

Loans
Credit Cards



Specialty Financing

Scotia Private Equity Sponsor Coverage Group
Capital Solutions
Asset Based Lending
Indirect Business Financing



Scotiabank Private Equity

Private Equity
Selected Investments



Capital Solutions
Roynat Capital can provide you with innovative financing solutions designed to help meet your company's strategic goals.
Learn more 
End of Banking & Investing menu.


  Leasing
    



Leasing menu opened.
Skip menu. 


Equipment

Equipment Financing
Vendor FInancing

 
Lease vs. Buy
We can help you determine if leasing makes sense for your business.
Create a customized program 
End of Leasing menu.


 Specialties
    



Specialties menu opened.
Skip menu. 


Sectors

Automotive
Agriculture

Franchising
Real Estate



Your business finances should run smoothly.
You can count on us for expert financial advice in every business sector.
Find a specialist 
End of Specialties menu.


  Global Trade
    



Global Trade menu opened.
Skip menu. 


Trade Finance

Exporting Services
Importing Services



Correspondent Banking

Compliance & Regulatory Requirements


 
Business anywhere, anytime 
Manage international trade transactions from across the globe.
Expand your global reach 
End of International Trade menu.







                      



You are in:Banking & InvestingSide Page Navigation.Products  Level 1.Operating AccountsInvestment AccountsMoney Market InstrumentsServices  Level 1.Cash Management ServicesScotia Institutional Asset Management 



1832 Asset Management L.P. Legal

 




Terms of Access

IMPORTANT: 
THIS NOTICE GOVERNS USE OF THE WORLD WIDE WEB SITES FOR Scotia Private Client Group , Scotia Institutional Asset Management, and WaterStreet  BY ACCESSING THESE SITES, YOU AGREE TO THE FOLLOWING TERMS. IF YOU DO NOT AGREE TO THESE TERMS, DO NOT ACCESS THIS SITE. 


This site contains information regarding the services of 1832 Asset Management L.P. (1832 L.P.) The services provided by 1832 L.P. are those which it is authorized by law to provide. 1832 L.P. is a member of the Scotiabank group of companies. 
Information in this site regarding services of of 1832 L.P. is applicable only in jurisdictions where such services and products may lawfully be offered for sale and is void where prohibited by law. If you access this site from outside of Canada, you are responsible for compliance with local, national and international laws. Not all services are available across Canada and services of 1832 L.P. are not offered for sale by 1832 L.P. in any jurisdiction outside of Canada. All of 1832 L.P.'s services are subject to the terms of applicable agreements. Descriptions of 1832 L.P.'s services in this site may include accompanying legal disclaimers, restrictions and disclosures of importance. You are deemed to have notice of them regardless of your use or downloading of only a part of this site.
This site is established solely for the exchange of information. It may not be used to place, buy or sell orders for securities or commodities, or to give instructions regarding accounts maintained by any user with 1832 L.P. For information regarding your existing accounts, contact your relationship manager. 
Use of this site is not intended and shall be deemed not to create any legal relationship of whatsoever kind between the user and 1832 L.P. or to amend or vary any existing legal relationship. 
This site, including the facts, data, information and other contents contained in it, is not intended to be: 
        
a comprehensive or detailed statement concerning the matters addressed, and factors may exist affecting the applicability of any statement to your circumstances; 
investment, tax, banking, accounting, legal, or other professional or expert advice; 
an offer to sell or buy or a recommendation to buy or sell stock, bond or other financial instrument, 
         and every user of this site is advised to seek professional advice before acting or omitting to act on any part of the site. 
        

Although 1832 L.P. believes the content of this site to be correct, it makes no warranty or representation as to the correctness or completeness of such information or its availability and access being uninterrupted with no delays, failures, errors or loss of transmitted information. Information in this site is subject to change without notice. 1832 L.P. does not, and does not intend to, and expressly disclaims any duty to, update or correct information on this site. 
World wide web sites accessed by hypertext links ("hyperlinks") appearing in this site have been independently developed by parties other than 1832 L.P., and 1832 L.P. has no control over information in any hyperlinked site. 1832 L.P. is providing hyperlinks to users of this site only as convenience. 1832 L.P. makes no representation, and is not responsible for the quality, content or reliability of any information in any hyperlinked site. The inclusion of any hyperlink in this site should not be construed as an endorsement by 1832 L.P. of the information in such hyperlinked site and does not imply that 1832 L.P. has investigated the hyperlinked site and does not imply that 1832 L.P. has investigated, verified or monitored the information in any such hyperlinked site. Should you wish to inquire about creating a link from your world wide web site to this site, or about the use of the names of members of the Scotiabank group of companies, contact 1832 L.P. by telephone at (416) 933-1900 for written authorization. 
The listing of or reference to any independent organization should not be construed as an endorsement by 1832 L.P. of such organization's services or products. 
This site is not a secure medium for communication. Any confidential, proprietary, or sensitive information transmitted by a user by means of this site, including by email, may be read and copied and possibly altered by unauthorized persons. 
Copyright in the content of this site, including the screens displaying the pages and their arrangement, is owned by The Bank of Nova Scotia unless otherwise indicated. All rights reserved. Users of this site may copy this site for their own personal use but without the prior written permission of 1832 L.P. may not republish or reproduce any substantial part of this site in any manner whatsoever, including electronically reproducing this site by "uploading", "downloading" or "accessing" this site onto the Internet or any other local or international computer system, and any such unauthorized use constitutes copyright infringement. Any report included in this site may not be reproduced in whole or in part, or referred to in any manner whatsoever, nor may the information, opinions, and conclusions contained in it be referred to without in each case the prior express consent of 1832 L.P. Use of any software downloaded from this site is governed by the terms of any license agreement provided with that software. 
The display of trademarks in this site does not imply that a license of any kind has been granted. All service and product names are trademarks of their respective owners. The Bank of Nova Scotia is the owner of the Canadian trademarks Scotiabank, Scotia, 1832 Asset Management, ScotiaFunds, Dynamic Funds, Scotia Institutional Asset Management, WaterStreet Family Offices, and other trademarks the ownership of which is attributed to The Bank of Nova Scotia in the Legal section of its website at www.scotiabank.com. 
1832 L.P. and the operator of this site expressly disclaim any liability for losses or damages, whether direct, indirect, special, or consequential, or other consequences, howsoever caused, arising out of the use of this site or any reproduction of this site, whether authorized or not. By accessing this site, each user of this site releases 1832 L.P. and all related companies and their respective officers, directors, agents, and employees from all claims and proceedings for such losses, damages or consequences.
Canadian laws apply to this site and to the use of this site by any user, notwithstanding the domicile, residence or physical location of the user. The user of this site submits and attorns to the exclusive jurisdiction of the courts of the Province of Ontario to determine any proceeding arising out of the use of this site.
Adobe; Adobe and Design and Acrobat are registered trademarks of Adobe Systems Corporation in Canada. Adobe Get Acrobat Reader & Design is a trademark of Adobe Systems Corporation.
BLOOMBERG® is a registered mark of Bloomberg L.P. Permission to use BLOOMBERG® was provided by Bloomberg L.P. Bloomberg L.P. reserves all rights.
      



















 Banking & Investing  
Payables Business Interest Account 

  Financing 
Credit Cards  Asset Based Lending 

 Leasing  
Equipment Financing Vendor Financing 

 Specialties  
Automotive Agriculture 

 Global Trade 
TradeExpress Exporting Services 




In the Spotlight
Quarterly ResultsOur Q2 results have been released
    

 Global Transaction Banking 
See what we have to offer around the world Global Transaction Banking 


 Small Business Banking 
Start or grow your small business
        with Small Business Banking 














		© 2017 Scotiabank.com All Rights Reserved
	















1832 Asset Management LP: Company Profile - Bloomberg



































































  









Feedback






















































1832 asset management lp
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Wealth Management
1832 Asset Management L.P. of Canada operates as a wealth management firm. The Company provides investment management, financial planning, and advisory services. 1832 Asset Management serves charitable foundations, institutions, and private clients.




Corporate Information
Address:

Dynamic Funds Twr, 1 Adelaide
Street East, 28th Floor
Toronto, ON M5C 2V9
Canada


Phone:
1-416-365-6480


Fax:
1-416-365-5128


Web url:
www.1832.ca























From The Web











Key Executives


Donald B Macdonald


Senior VP/Portfolio Manager




Peter Rawson


VP/Portfolio Manager




Jason Gibbs


VP/Portfolio Manager







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data


































1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor ChangeHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets open in 4 hrs 11 minsS&P Futures2,469.25+0.75 (+0.03%)Dow Futures21,501.00+2.00 (+0.01%)Nasdaq Futures5,931.25-2.75 (-0.05%)1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor ChangeCNW GroupMarch 31, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareTORONTO , March 31, 2017 /CNW/ - 1832 Asset Management L.P. ("1832 Asset Management"), as manager of the Scotia Private Pools® today announced a portfolio advisor change to Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool (the "Pool").View photosEffective June 1, 2017 , Barrantagh Investment Management Inc. ("Barrantagh") will be appointed portfolio advisor for Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool, replacing the current portfolio advisor. Founded in 1995, Barrantagh is an employee-owned investment manager based in Toronto, Ontario . With approximately $1.2 billion in assets under management, Barrantagh applies a fundamental value-oriented approach to investment management on behalf of institutions and private clients.1832 Asset Management uses a manager selection process that leverages the global research capabilities of investment management consultant, NT Global Advisors, Inc., a Northern Trust Corporation affiliate, to identify and evaluate best in class investment managers for Scotia Private Pools. Barrantagh joins an already strong line-up of portfolio advisors for the Scotia Private Pools. There will be no change to the investment objective of the Pool as a result of this portfolio advisor change.Scotia Private Pools are a family of investment pools managed by 1832 Asset Management and distributed through ScotiaMcLeod®, a division of Scotia Capital Inc. (a member of the Canadian Investor Protection Fund and the Investment Industry Regulatory Organization of Canada ).Commissions, trailing commissions, management fees and expenses all may be associated with mutual fund investments. Please read the simplified prospectus before investing. Mutual funds are not guaranteed or insured by the Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government deposit insurer, their values change frequently and past performance may not be repeated.About 1832 Asset Management L.P.1832 Asset Management offers a range of wealth management solutions, including mutual funds, and investment solutions for private clients, institutional clients and managed asset programs. 1832 Asset Management is a limited partnership, the general partner of which is wholly owned by Scotiabank.About ScotiabankScotiabank is Canada's international bank and a leading financial services provider in North America , Latin America , the Caribbean and Central America , and Asia-Pacific . We are dedicated to helping our 23 million customers become better off through a broad range of advice, products and services, including personal and commercial banking, wealth management and private banking, corporate and investment banking, and capital markets. With a team of more than 88,000 employees and assets of $887 billion (as at January 31, 2017 ), Scotiabank trades on the Toronto (BNS) and New York Exchanges (BNS). For more information, please visit www.scotiabank.com and follow us on Twitter @ScotiabankViews.®Registered trademark of The Bank of Nova Scotia . Used under license.SOURCE ScotiabankView photosTo view the original version on PR Newswire, visit: http://www.newswire.ca/en/releases/archive/March2017/31/c7072.htmlReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextHere's Trump's approval rating in every stateBusiness InsiderEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredParents railed against the Boy Scouts of America after Trump's campaign-style speechBusiness InsiderFirst ‘Avengers: Infinity War’ Trailer LeakedInvestorPlaceChina is crushing American tech titansYahoo Finance VideoStart Earning Miles With The Best Travel CardWise BreadSponsoredMcDonald's, GM, and Domino's — What you need to know in markets on TuesdayYahoo FinanceObamacare is hurting these people—and Congress is doing nothing about itYahoo FinanceUnder Armour ripped up Jordan Spieth's old contract before he won his first major and gave him a 10-year deal, and it's already paid off big timeBusiness InsiderWhat Happened To Jenna Jameson?SportingzSponsoredThe $180 million conflict that kept Scaramucci out of the White House in January has only gotten shadierBusiness InsiderGoogle's forward guidance trumps earnings any day: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks rangebound ahead of big earningsYahoo FinanceHow To Cash In Big On The Bitcoin Craze By July 28Agora FinancialSponsoredThe Navy's newest, most sophisticated aircraft carrier doesn't have urinalsBusiness InsiderThe one question you should always ask in a job interview, according to Wharton's top professorCNBCRex Tillerson Debates Quitting After ‘Unprofessional’ Trump Bashes Jeff SessionsFlorence Lee: Trump screws over EVERYONE.  Pay attention, people.  He even skewered himself by declaring "made in america" week, knowing that we all know his products are NOT made in america.  He thumbs his nose at everyone, in every single statement, in every single thought.  He is a psychopath and I can't imagine what america will look like when he is done playing emperor.Join the Conversation1 / 52k


































Manager Monitor: Chuk Wong, 1832 Asset Management LP - Article - investmentexecutive.com - Investment Executive



























Contact Us






















Subscribe and Receive

Newspaper
Newsletters

Subscribe





 IE - Investment Executive



Use this form to search the IE website
Enter search terms



































Products



Print this article







Share









Tweet




Write to us
Print










Contrarian manager favours emerging markets

	
      		By  Michael Ryval  | 	
         	September 12, 2014  12:30
Source: Morningstar Canada	
        


















Companies cited in this article1832 Asset Management LPDynamic Funds retracts proposed fund mergersScotia launches new credit absolute return fundMore











 Chuk Wong believes that markets follow cycles and the best time to invest is when markets are perceived to be hopeless. In this case, he considers emerging markets as one of the most attractive places to be.  "In the last five years, the best time to have started to invest in the U.S was 2009-10 — when the U.S. economy was considered doomed. And the best time to invest in Europe was in 2011-12, when Euroland was regarded as doomed," says Wong, vice-president at Toronto-based 1832 Asset Management LP, and manager of Dynamic Global Value. "The question today is, which region is the most out of favour? The emerging markets."  Investors tend to identify emerging markets solely with China, says Wong, although it accounts for about 30% of emerging markets in aggregate. "No one equates the global economy with the U.S.," he adds. "But people equate emerging markets with China. That's not right. These markets do not move in tandem."


















 Moreover, even if the direction of China's economy is uncertain, Wong argues that the worst appears to be over. "There are some signs of stabilization," he says, noting that the Purchasing Managers' Index is back in positive territory. "If the economy continues to be weak, there will be more fiscal stimuli. Like other countries, China will respond with policy initiatives. The downside is quite limited from here."  While U.S. equity markets have roared ahead, Wong has become cautious and lowered the weighting in the Morningstar 3-star-rated Dynamic Global Value to about 16%, versus 28% a year ago. "The U.S. market is not cheap by historical standards. It's in the seventh inning, to use an analogy," he says.  For Wong, who is responsible for managing about $1.5 billion, there's better value in Europe and the emerging markets. The former accounts for about 35% of the fund, while emerging markets represent 26% of the portfolio, compared with 13% in the MSCI All Country World Index.  One representative European holding is Greece's Alpha Bank SA, which Wong acquired last year. "When you look at an economy in crisis, the best time to buy is when the balance sheet has been recapitalized and when profitability before provisioning is on the turn," he says, adding that the stock is trading below book value. The other factor is that since the Greek banking industry has undergone a significant consolidation, Alpha Bank has emerged as a leading player.  "Once things stabilize, and the Greek economy improves," says Wong, "the banking sector will be a great place to be." At 2.8% of the fund, Alpha is one of the largest holdings in a 60-name portfolio. Wong is generally a buy-and-hold investor, as illustrated by last year's low portfolio turnover of 21.2%.  A Hong Kong native, Wong earned a bachelor of business administration in 1984 from the Chinese University of Hong Kong, After graduating, he was hired as a loans-syndication officer at Bank of East Asia. Two years later, he moved to Vancouver and enrolled in the MSc in business administration program at University of British Columbia. Upon graduating in 1989, he became a sales associate at Daiwa Securities Canada Ltd.  In 1991, Wong went back to Hong Kong, in order to apply for Canadian landed-immigrant status, and rejoined Bank of East Asia as an analyst covering Hong Kong-listed stocks and managing U.S. investments for the bank. In 1993, he returned to Canada and was hired as an investment-performance analyst at Gluskin Sheff & Associates Inc. In 1996, he moved to Goodman & Co. Investment Counsel Ltd., (which was renamed 1832 Asset Management in November of last year), as a securities analyst covering Far East stocks.  Later in 1996, Wong assumed responsibility for Dynamic Far East Value, a Morningstar 4-star fund. He has one of the longest manager track records in the Asia Pacific Equity category.  Over the past 12 months ended in July, the fund was in the second quartile. That is attributable to Wong avoiding Japan, a market that performed very well in 2013. "I'm still underweight Japan," he says. "I stick to my discipline — be contrarian and look for value. My strategy does not work every quarter. But in the long run, the funds are in good shape."







Share









Tweet




Write to us
Print


























Related Content



      Videos
    






 Managing risk: Active vs passive investing




        Articles
      



 Sun Life to make changes to mutual fund line-up




 Invesco to merge two of its mutual funds




 Fidelity shuffles portfolio managers following departures






















































Most Popular


Viewed
Shared






Capacity and clients: Understanding the Ontario Substitute Decisions Act




Why you need a "Project Forever"




IIROC fines Scotia Capital over advisors’ risky trading strategy




Feds propose closing tax loopholes for wealthy Canadians




OSFI proposes revisions to capital rules for life insurers








Global green bond market hitting new milestones: J.P. Morgan




TSX climbs amid surge in energy sector




Venture exchanges could do more to attract smaller issuers




U.S. companies hoarding on to more cash




Venture investments drop in first half of 2017


















































Subscribe



Follow us

Newsletters
IE Mobile
LinkedIn
RSS
Twitter



News

Industry News
Company News
Economy & Markets
From the Regulators
People
Products
Research



Building your Business

Client Communications
Financial Planning
For Your Clients
Practice Management
Sales & Marketing
Strategies
Technology
Your Time



Multimedia Centre

News on IE TV
Building your Business on IE TV
Webinars
Winning Strategies
Insurance Insights



Tools and Resources



Back Issues


CE Place
Smart Edition
Advisor Central







Stay tuned
This feature will become available on October 24th























































1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor Change - The Business Journals



































Menu









Select a City



National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita

















Limited Time Offer
Subscribe Now







 Search


× Close











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 




Your Account


Welcome
Your Account 










Sign In
Existing Users




Create Your FREE Account
Don't have an account?




 






Your Account




Subscriptions




Newsletters


 

Custom Notifications




My Custom Site




Manage Site Users


 

Sign Out











Sign In


Sign In
Your Account 











 Search








 Home




Industries & Topics 




All Industries & Topics



Banking & Financial Services




Career & Workplace




Commercial Real Estate




Education




Energy




Food & Lifestyle




Government & Regulations




Health Care




Manufacturing




Media & Marketing




Philanthropy & Nonprofits




Professional Services




Residential Real Estate




Retailing




Sports Business




Technology




Transportation




Travel & Tourism




Sponsored Content



CRE Now




We Value Your Business




Office Environments




Small Business Marketing




Know Your Neighborhood










News 





News



Latest News




Business Pulse




Press Releases






 


Lists & Awards 





Lists



All Lists




Build Your Own Lists






 


People & Companies 





Companies



Top Private Companies




Find Businesses for Sale




Search for Company News





People



People on the Move




Contact Top Executives




Executive Profiles




Search for People in the News






 


Events 





Events



Business Event Calendar




Nominations






 


More… 






Jobs
Find or post a job




Store
Subscriptions, reprints & more









How To
Grow your business, advance your career




Thought Leadership
Trends, tips and insights from our partners





 


Subscribers 








Manage your Account






 


About & Contact 








About The Business Journals




Advertise




Help & FAQs




Call Center Directory






 


Apps & Syndication 








Newsletters






 


ACBJ Publications 








Bizwomen




Upstart




Hemmings




Sports Business Journal




Inside Lacrosse




BostInno




DCInno




ChicagoInno




AustinInno






 


Select a City 




National


Albany


Albuquerque


Atlanta


Austin


Baltimore


Birmingham


Boston


Buffalo


Charlotte


Chicago


Cincinnati


Columbus


Dallas


Dayton


Denver


Greensboro/Winston-Salem


Honolulu


Houston


Jacksonville


Kansas City


Los Angeles


Louisville


Memphis


Miami/Fort Lauderdale


Milwaukee


Minneapolis/St. Paul


Nashville


New York


Orlando


Philadelphia


Phoenix


Pittsburgh


Portland


Raleigh/Durham


Sacramento


San Antonio


San Francisco


Seattle


Silicon Valley


St. Louis


Tampa Bay


Washington, D.C.


Wichita







Follow us




 Twitter


 LinkedIn


 Facebook


 Google +













 






Press Releases



1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor Change






Mar 31, 2017, 3:00pm EDT














TORONTO, March 31, 2017 /CNW/ - 1832 Asset Management L.P. ("1832 Asset Management"), as manager of the Scotia Private Pools® today announced a portfolio advisor change to Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool (the "Pool"). 



Effective June 1, 2017, Barrantagh Investment Management Inc. ("Barrantagh") will be appointed portfolio advisor for Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool, replacing the current portfolio advisor. Founded in 1995, Barrantagh is an employee-owned investment manager based in Toronto, Ontario. With approximately $1.2 billion in assets under management, Barrantagh applies a fundamental value-oriented approach to investment management on behalf of institutions and private clients. 
1832 Asset Management uses a manager selection process that leverages the global research capabilities of investment management consultant, NT Global Advisors, Inc., a Northern Trust Corporation affiliate, to identify and evaluate best in class investment managers for Scotia Private Pools. Barrantagh joins an already strong line-up of portfolio advisors for the Scotia Private Pools. There will be no change to the investment objective of the Pool as a result of this portfolio advisor change.
Scotia Private Pools are a family of investment pools managed by 1832 Asset Management and distributed through ScotiaMcLeod®, a division of Scotia Capital Inc. (a member of the Canadian Investor Protection Fund and the Investment Industry Regulatory Organization of Canada). 
Commissions, trailing commissions, management fees and expenses all may be associated with mutual fund investments. Please read the simplified prospectus before investing. Mutual funds are not guaranteed or insured by the Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government deposit insurer, their values change frequently and past performance may not be repeated.
About 1832 Asset Management L.P.1832 Asset Management offers a range of wealth management solutions, including mutual funds, and investment solutions for private clients, institutional clients and managed asset programs. 1832 Asset Management is a limited partnership, the general partner of which is wholly owned by Scotiabank.
About ScotiabankScotiabank is Canada's international bank and a leading financial services provider in North America, Latin America, the Caribbean and Central America, and Asia-Pacific. We are dedicated to helping our 23 million customers become better off through a broad range of advice, products and services, including personal and commercial banking, wealth management and private banking, corporate and investment banking, and capital markets. With a team of more than 88,000 employees and assets of $887 billion (as at January 31, 2017), Scotiabank trades on the Toronto (TSX: BNS) and New York Exchanges (NYSE: BNS). For more information, please visit www.scotiabank.com and follow us on Twitter @ScotiabankViews.
®Registered trademark of The Bank of Nova Scotia. Used under license. 


SOURCE  Scotiabank




The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. All rights reserved. Reproduction or redistribution of this content without prior written consent from PR Newswire is strictly prohibited.  is not responsible for this content. Learn more about this service.








 





 





About PR Newswire







                                            The information on this page is provided by PR Newswire. The Business Journals is not responsible for this content.
                                        



Learn More







 









 
 


 


  













1832 ASSET MANAGEMENT L.P. Institutional Portfolio - NASDAQ.com
























































Hot Topics:
ETFs |
Smart Portfolio |
Currencies |
Online Broker Center















Search






















Home > 
	Quotes > 
	Ownership & Insider Trades > 
    Institutional Portfolio






1832 ASSET MANAGEMENT L.P.






1 ADELAIDE STREET EAST, TORONTO,  , M5V 2C9, (416) 863-6990


Report Date: 03/31/2017

Position Statistics


Total Positions
841


New Positions
91


Increased Positions
147


Decreased Positions
688


Positions with Activity
835


Sold Out Positions
143


Total Mkt Value (in $ millions)
29,470



Institutional Holdings information is filed by major institutions on form 13-F with the Securities and Exchange Commission.



Sector Weighting



Energy
10.62%


Basic Materials
3.23%


Industrials
12.46%


Consumer Cyclicals
9.79%


Consumer Non-Cyclicals
2.89%


Financials
26.45%


Healthcare
8%


Technology
17.27%


Telecommunication Services
6.7%


Utilities
2.58%









Total Positions




New




Increased




Decreased




Activity




Sold Out






841 Positions as of 03/31/2017


Company

Class

Value of Shares ($1,000s) ▼

Change in Value ($1,000s)

Change (%)

Shares Held



TORONTO DOMINION BK ONT
COM NEW
964,547
-833,324
(46.35)
18,509,821


ROYAL BK CDA MONTREAL QUE
COM
964,136
-1,376,499
(58.81)
12,758,186


BANK N S HALIFAX
COM
873,586
-820,266
(48.43)
14,078,745


TRANSCANADA CORP
COM
826,133
-1,068,272
(56.39)
16,053,895


CDN IMPERIAL BK COMM TORONTO O
COM
751,279
-708,533
(48.54)
8,706,441


MICROSOFT CORP
COM
734,159
-750,962
(50.57)
9,949,308


CANADIAN NATL RY CO
COM
633,635
-612,650
(49.16)
7,729,147


BCE INC
COM NEW
564,120
-428,013
(43.14)
12,087,421


CANADIAN PAC RY LTD
COM
519,698
-594,558
(53.36)
3,204,847


FORTIS INC
COM
509,637
-410,428
(44.61)
14,263,566


SUNCOR ENERGY INC NEW
COM
495,668
-409,646
(45.25)
16,177,145


ROGERS COMMUNICATIONS INC
CL B
493,374
-650,860
(56.88)
9,388,665


MANULIFE FINL CORP
COM
490,296
-766,658
(60.99)
24,344,380


CANADIAN NAT RES LTD
COM
472,966
-112,214
(19.18)
15,924,786


VISA INC
COM CL A
433,435
-641,665
(59.68)
4,351,759


ENBRIDGE INC
COM
427,359
-496,498
(53.74)
10,221,464


JOHNSON & JOHNSON
COM
421,074
-518,293
(55.18)
3,111,924


SUN LIFE FINL INC
COM
416,726
-242,939
(36.83)
11,083,125


COMCAST CORP NEW
CL A
367,765
-521,362
(58.64)
9,279,954


BROOKFIELD ASSET MGMT INC
CL A LTD VT SH
360,327
-352,016
(49.42)
9,083,100




<< first< previous1234510203040next >last >>








Latest News Headlines




                            Affimed Announces Second Quarter 2017 Financial Results and Corporate Update Conference Call
                        



	                     5:01AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                




                            Mobilise Technology Launches Copenhagen Airport Wi-Fi Travel Service Powered by iPass
                        



	                     5:00AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                




                            Strong results boost FTSE, Jimmy Choo soars on Michael Kors takeover
                        



	                     4:44AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Saudi Arabia hires Goldman for Riyadh airport's stake sale-sources
                        



	                     4:40AM ET  - Reuters
	                




                            Nano One Files Lithium Iron Phosphate Patent
                        



	                     4:32AM ET  - GlobeNewswire
	                





View All Latest Headlines



































CLOSEX

Edit Favorites

Enter up to 25 symbols separated by commas or spaces in the text box below. These symbols will be available during your session for use on applicable pages.






Update

Clear List







CLOSEX
Customize your NASDAQ.com experience
Background Color Selector

Select the background color of your choice:





 Black
							





 Slate Gray
							






 Light Gray
							





 Gray Blue
							






Quote Search

Select a default target page for your quote search:



						 Real-Time

						 After Hours

						 Pre-Market
 News
					


						 Flash Quote

						 Summary Quote

						 Interactive Charts

						 Default Setting




					Please note that once you make your selection, it will apply to all future visits to NASDAQ.com.
					If, at any time, you are interested in reverting to our default settings, please select Default Setting above.
					
					If you have any questions or encounter any issues in changing your default settings, please email isfeedback@nasdaq.com.
				





CLOSEX
Please confirm your selection:

					You have selected to change your default setting for the Quote Search. This will now be your default target page;
					unless you change your configuration again, or you delete your
					cookies. Are you sure you want to change your settings?


YES
NO













CLOSEX


Please disable your ad blocker (or update your settings to ensure that javascript and cookies are enabled), so that we can continue to provide you with the first-rate market news and data you've come to expect from us.





CLOSEX








































1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor ChangeHomeMailFlickrTumblrNewsSportsFinanceCelebrityAnswersGroupsMobileMoreTry Yahoo Finance on Firefox »YahooSearchSearchSign inU.S. Markets open in 4 hrs 11 minsS&P Futures2,469.25+0.75 (+0.03%)Dow Futures21,501.00+2.00 (+0.01%)Nasdaq Futures5,931.25-2.75 (-0.05%)1832 Asset Management L.P. Announces Portfolio Advisor ChangePR NewswireMarch 31, 2017ReblogShareTweetShareTORONTO, March 31, 2017 /CNW/ - 1832 Asset Management L.P. ("1832 Asset Management"), as manager of the Scotia Private Pools® today announced a portfolio advisor change to Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool (the "Pool").Effective June 1, 2017, Barrantagh Investment Management Inc. ("Barrantagh") will be appointed portfolio advisor for Scotia Private Canadian Mid Cap Pool, replacing the current portfolio advisor. Founded in 1995, Barrantagh is an employee-owned investment manager based in Toronto, Ontario. With approximately $1.2 billion in assets under management, Barrantagh applies a fundamental value-oriented approach to investment management on behalf of institutions and private clients.1832 Asset Management uses a manager selection process that leverages the global research capabilities of investment management consultant, NT Global Advisors, Inc., a Northern Trust Corporation affiliate, to identify and evaluate best in class investment managers for Scotia Private Pools. Barrantagh joins an already strong line-up of portfolio advisors for the Scotia Private Pools. There will be no change to the investment objective of the Pool as a result of this portfolio advisor change.Scotia Private Pools are a family of investment pools managed by 1832 Asset Management and distributed through ScotiaMcLeod®, a division of Scotia Capital Inc. (a member of the Canadian Investor Protection Fund and the Investment Industry Regulatory Organization of Canada).Commissions, trailing commissions, management fees and expenses all may be associated with mutual fund investments. Please read the simplified prospectus before investing. Mutual funds are not guaranteed or insured by the Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation or any other government deposit insurer, their values change frequently and past performance may not be repeated.About 1832 Asset Management L.P.1832 Asset Management offers a range of wealth management solutions, including mutual funds, and investment solutions for private clients, institutional clients and managed asset programs. 1832 Asset Management is a limited partnership, the general partner of which is wholly owned by Scotiabank.About ScotiabankScotiabank is Canada's international bank and a leading financial services provider in North America, Latin America, the Caribbean and Central America, and Asia-Pacific. We are dedicated to helping our 23 million customers become better off through a broad range of advice, products and services, including personal and commercial banking, wealth management and private banking, corporate and investment banking, and capital markets. With a team of more than 88,000 employees and assets of $887 billion (as at January 31, 2017), Scotiabank trades on the Toronto (BNS) and New York Exchanges (BNS). For more information, please visit www.scotiabank.com and follow us on Twitter @ScotiabankViews.®Registered trademark of The Bank of Nova Scotia. Used under license.ReblogShareTweetShareRecently ViewedYour list is empty.What to Read NextHere's Trump's approval rating in every stateBusiness InsiderEngineer Finds Pattern; Makes Millions in StocksMoney MorningSponsoredFirst ‘Avengers: Infinity War’ Trailer LeakedInvestorPlaceThe Navy's newest, most sophisticated aircraft carrier doesn't have urinalsBusiness InsiderChina is crushing American tech titansYahoo Finance VideoStart Earning Miles With The Best Travel CardWise BreadSponsoredMcDonald's, GM, and Domino's — What you need to know in markets on TuesdayYahoo FinanceObamacare is hurting these people—and Congress is doing nothing about itYahoo FinanceParents railed against the Boy Scouts of America after Trump's campaign-style speechBusiness InsiderWhat Happened To Jenna Jameson?SportingzSponsoredUnder Armour ripped up Jordan Spieth's old contract before he won his first major and gave him a 10-year deal, and it's already paid off big timeBusiness InsiderGoogle's forward guidance trumps earnings any day: NYSE traderYahoo Finance VideoStocks rangebound ahead of big earningsYahoo FinanceHow To Cash In Big On The Bitcoin Craze By July 28Agora FinancialSponsoredThe $180 million conflict that kept Scaramucci out of the White House in January has only gotten shadierBusiness InsiderThe one question you should always ask in a job interview, according to Wharton's top professorCNBCRex Tillerson Debates Quitting After ‘Unprofessional’ Trump Bashes Jeff SessionsFlorence Lee: Trump screws over EVERYONE.  Pay attention, people.  He even skewered himself by declaring "made in america" week, knowing that we all know his products are NOT made in america.  He thumbs his nose at everyone, in every single statement, in every single thought.  He is a psychopath and I can't imagine what america will look like when he is done playing emperor.Join the Conversation1 / 52k













MUTUAL:DYN3906 Mutual Fund - 1832-Asset-Management-LP Summary - Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 













 Stock Quotes and Investment Research  -- Quicken® Investing Center







| Quicken
















 












Skip to main content






Quicken Logo




Quicken Logo








United StatesCanada

 



            Cart            



Sign InMy Account
Investment Portfolio

 









You are here









Loading... 












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













Manage IT assets with Freshservice









































IT Asset Management Software
Maintain inventory of your IT and non-IT assets and track details throughout its lifecycle. Sign up for free
 











Try Freshservice free for 30 days







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 



















Get a free demo of Freshservice







First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





No.of agents





Phone No.
















Everything you need to take control of your assets





CMDB


Asset Overview


Asset Mapping


















































Everything you need to take control of your assets


CMDB
View all the assets and contracts used by the organization in a single pane, and see details like its type, location, and the person or department using it.



Asset Overview
View all details of an asset’s lifecycle – from acquisition to expiry. Get context about its usage and plan future asset purchases.



Asset Mapping
Visualize dependencies and relationships with asset relationship map view.










Freshservice features to enhance your service delivery




Incident Management
Resolve tickets raised via email, self-service portal, phone, or in person. Track, prioritize, assign, and automate resolution processes to drive efficiency.





Service Catalog
Offer multiple services for various departments with the service catalog so users can place and receive requests in no time.





Knowledge Base
Create solutions for your incidents, automatically convert it to knowledge base articles, and improve productivity by responding to similar requests with canned responses.





Reporting
Identify bottlenecks, make informed decisions, monitor service desk performance, and improve service delivery with predefined and custom reporting capabilities.





Integrations
Make work simpler with popular third-party integrations and customizable plugins so you can manage services from the single window of your Freshservice account.





Gamification
Integrated game mechanics transforms the service desk to a game and makes work fun by motivating agents with rewards for tasks.




Sign up for freeRequest Demo 


The Freshservice impact on our customers
















““If another organization is frustrated with their current ITSM tool and wants a breath of fresh air, then Freshservice is there ready and waiting.””



          Adam Le Feuvre
        
Project Manager
M&C Saatchi



















“We’ve seen infinite improvements in our service desk with Freshservice. Being an evidence-based business, Freshservice helps us drive intelligent decisions by letting us track data.”



          Tom Peach-Geraghty
        
Head of IT Operations
Unidays



















“Freshservice has helped us improve our ability to serve to requests or queries in an elegant and professional manner. The portal experience is very good.”



          Karthikeyan Rammohan
        
Manager of People Operations
Flipkart



















“Veeva's teams are able to resolve issues in less than 4 hours with more visibility into end-users’ issues in Freshservice.”



          Prasad Ramakrishnan
        
Chief Information Officer
Veeva Systems



















“I was surprised at the speed of implementation, Freshservice was available the next day and ready to use in under a week.”



          Craig Bell
        
IT Service Director
Cordant





























Trusted by over 10,000 customers

















































































































Try Freshservice free for 30 days


Sign up with google
or




Please confirm your company and service desk domain ID








First Name






Last Name







Email





Company





.freshservice.com
Service desk name






Phone No.





  




By signing up, you agree to our   T & C   and   privacy policy 































Cloud Service Desk Software  | Freshservice


















































Freshworks















Cloud Service Desk Software
Online IT solution better than On-premise
Seamlessly integrate and store everything on cloud
GET STARTED FOR FREE

 


Something better than On-premise software.. 
Wary of hosting servers and switching between multiple tools in different locations? You need something reliable to provide reliable data and automated workflows. Here is where cloud service desk software has filled a void. More and more enterprises have started opting for cloud based software over on-premise versions.








Why Choose Cloud service desk software over On-Premise

No or limited capital expenditure
Multiple locations with server on the cloud

Easy configuration and customization
Scalable and systematic workflow
Automated service desk
No worries about storage limits





Why you need Freshservice cloud service desk?
Freshservice SaaS helps you save you thousands of dollars which might be going down the drain with your current or almost non-existent help desk. 
Flexible cloud-based ITSM
Embed Freshservice’s one-touch service on your Android or iOS smartphone and use your cloud based service desk on the go. Add as many agents you require; assign tasks, monitor your agents and CI in just a few clicks. Get unlimited storage on the cloud with no hardware restrictions to boggle you down. 
Multichannel & Go mobile
Access and maintain your help desk from anywhere. You can use your SaaS service desk through different portals without any hiccups. You don’t have to rely on hosted servers or different integrations or applications to get your work running. You can even keep your data secure with periodic backups . 
Cost effective
Freshservice is cost effective, simple and efficient to use. You don’t have to invest in hosting, installing, configuration or any kind of infrastructure. Everything is available on the cloud. Save your valuable time and resources when you use Freshservice; eliminate all the unnecessary things your incompetent service desk makes you do.
Know more about Freshservice Service Desk Software


Need more reasons?? Check out Freshservice ITSM Features

IT Trouble Ticketing Software


IT Service Request Management Tool



IT Asset Management Software


IT Financial Management



ITIL Configuration Management


Service Desk Automation





Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds

Try Freshservice Now













Freshservice Integrations | Integrate your ITIL Service Desk with tools you are already using!









































Integrate with other apps you use and love
Freshservice fits right into your existing business ecosystem with integrations available for popular business apps. 
Sign up for free

 



Native Integrations














Atlassian JIRA

Map bugs to tasks and tickets from inside Freshservice

Learn more

















Rescue

Share users' screens instantly, and solve problems in real time

Learn more

















FreshBooks

Track time on tasks and tickets, plus get the option of invoicing

Learn more

















G Suite

Sign into your service desk directly from Google Apps with Single Sign On

Learn more

















Harvest

Time tracking and invoicing options in your service desk

Learn more

















SurveyMonkey

Enhance your customer support with meaningful feedback

Learn more

















Zapier

Easy to bridge the gap between your service desk and different applications

Learn more

















Dropbox

Send large files and attachments easily

Learn more

















Bomgar

Provide remote desktop assistance with screen-sharing and secure web-based live chat support

Learn more

















SCCM

Advanced asset discovery module to sync your inventories with the service desk 

Learn more

















Box

Share large files and documents from your service desk 

Learn more

















Amazon web services

Import virtual assets right from cloud storage EC2, RDS and EBS directly to your CMDB

Learn more

















Pagerduty

Incident management system to monitor, schedule and create alerts for all your tickets

Learn more

















Cloudwatch

Convert AWS CloudWatch alarms to tickets and alarm notifications to ticket notes

Learn more

















Quickbooks

Send time spent on tickets to QuickBooks for easy billing

Learn more

















ClearGraph

Interactive real-time reports with custom dashboards

Learn more

















DocuSign

Send contracts for online e-signature and approval from your service desk

Learn more

















Slack

Get alerts and resolve issues right from Slack channels

Learn more

















Office 365

Schedule and sync Freshservice events to your Office 365 Calendar

Learn more

















Salesforce

Import your Salesforce contact information straight into Freshservice

Learn more

















Yammer

Automatically convert your Yammer newsfeed into tickets within your service desk

Learn more

















WorkflowMax

Log time spent on your Freshservice tickets in your WorkflowMax jobs and tasks

Learn more

















Workday

Easily enter new data and create service requests to onboard new employees

Learn more









Get your own ITIL-aligned service desk in 30 seconds
Start your 30-day free trial. No credit card required. No strings attached. 
Sign up for free

 
























Freshservice Pricing Plans | Enterprise ITSM Solution at $0









































Refreshing service management at $0
Enjoy free 30-day Estate trial and free forever on Sprout 




MONTHLY



Save upto 20%

YEARLY







SPROUT
For getting started




                    FREE
                

up to 3 agents and 100 assets




100 End UsersIncident ManagementSelf-service PortalKnowledge BaseAsset ManagementAD Integration 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






BLOSSOM
Perfect for small teams




$
29


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Sprout and…

Unlimited End UsersStandard ReportsMultiple Help Desk EmailsCustom Domain MappingTime Tracking  




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details








GARDEN
Ideal for growing teams




$
49


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Blossom and…

Change, Problem, & Release ManagementMultiple SLAsPriority MatrixScheduled ReportsCustom Roles 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details






ESTATE
Best value for large teams




$
79


/agent/month billed annually


                      per additional asset
                    



Everything in Garden and…

Service CatalogEnterprise ReportsProject ManagementEnterprise Security - Custom SSL & Trusted IPContract Management 




                START TRIAL
              


View details
Hide details









24 x 7 email support and 24 x 5 phone support included with all plans
Can’t decide which plan is right for you? 
See our complete feature comparison












Day Passes
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Need extra support help for a product launch or other spike? Day Passes make it easy for you to add extra agents temporarily when you need them. Just add them as occasional agents, buy a few Day Passes, and let them use a day pass for each day they need to access your support.
Read more 









Frequently Asked Questions

How does the 30-day free trial work?After you sign up, you get free unrestricted access to all the features available in Freshservice for 30 days. Thereafter, you can upgrade to a suitable plan.Is my data safe?We take security seriously. Our servers are hosted in a world class data center that is protected by biometric locks and 24-hour surveillance. We ensure that our application is always up to date with the latest security patches. Our data center is EU-US privacy shield compliant and all Freshservice plans include SSL encryption to keep your data safe.Do you have any contracts or cancellation fees?No. We do not have contracts or cancellation fees. You can cancel whenever you want and you will only be billed for that particular month.What types of payment do you accept?We accept Visa, Mastercard, Discover, American Express, and also PayPal. For annual contracts, we accept checks and online transfers in USD, EUR, GBP currencies.Can I upgrade or downgrade anytime?Yes. Freshservice offers a pay-as-you-go service, and you can upgrade, downgrade or cancel at any time. To change your plan, visit 'Plans & Billing' in your Freshservice account.Do you offer any discounts?Yes. Freshservice offers discounts to non-profit organizations, educational institutions and large teams. Contact support@freshservice.com for personalized pricing. Who is an agent? Can I add an agent on short term basis?In Freshservice, an agent can either be full-time or occasional, depending on your requirement. A full-time agent is someone who is part of your core service desk team. An occasional agent is someone who requires access to the service desk only on need-to basis. By default, Freshservice offers 3 free Day Passes at the time of sign up. For adding more occasional agents, you can purchase Day Passes starting from $1. Anybody can be added as an occasional agent, and the admin can define their role and scope of access to the service desk portal.Can I buy features as add-ons? Only some features are available for purchase as add-ons at the moment. Contact support@freshservice.com about customized plans. Have any other questions?If you have questions about Freshservice or the sign up process, please email us at support@freshservice.com and we will be glad to answer all your questions. 






Get Freshservice for iOS and Android
Get extra support help for a product launch or other spike
Freshservice's mobile apps have been thoughtfully designed to help your team stay in touch with users, even when they're not at their desks. With the iOS and Android apps, your team can stay on top of incoming tickets, collaborate with other agents, and respond to issues on the go.






































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












U.S. Trust - Wealth Structuring




















































  Search

HomeAbout UsOur CapabilitiesOur Latest ThinkingAccount Access









1.800.U.S.TRUST|
Have Us Contact You|
Find an Office Near You|
Client Login



























Wealth Structuring
Preservation and Transfer
Your wealth plan is designed to provide you and your family with thoughtful and innovative solutions customized to the financial and personal complexities of your life.  We bring you knowledge, experience and expertise across the broad range of wealth structuring disciplines.






Wealth Planning
Integrating your personal and financial affairs
By thinking holistically about all aspects of your wealth, we develop customized strategies to help pursue your unique goals. Wealth structuring can help you address issues including:

The cash flow required to help meet your lifestyle
The investments needed to help meet long-range objectives 
The most effective way to pursue estate planning goals 
The tax implications of the many aspects of managing and transferring your wealth

Trusts and Estates
Shaping your legacy and transferring your wealth
For more than two centuries, U.S. Trust has been helping many of America's wealthiest families build estate plans and implement wealth transfer strategies. Your team can work with you to build a sound estate plan that may help you:

Control the transfer of wealth to those you care about
Fulfill important philanthropic commitments
Reduce estate taxes
Maintain your privacy
Protect assets from creditors and other third parties

We can help you and your attorney establish trusts to provide financial security for your spouse or partner, pass assets to future generations and charities and reduce estate taxes, as well as provide for financial and investment management during your lifetime. We bring our extensive knowledge and experience to bear in helping clients manage their trusts whether we are serving as agent for trustee or corporate trustee.
Philanthropy
Making your charitable giving more fulfilling and effective
We offer you personal support and an array of tools to help you and your family assess your charitable goals, values and interests. Your philanthropic specialist can then help you understand a range of important considerations, including how to:

Implement your plan
Identify the best-qualified grant recipients
Monitor the impact of your efforts

We can help you design and implement a philanthropic strategy that helps you fulfill your values-based commitments in a way that is consistent with your lifestyle.
Learn more about Philanthropy at U.S. Trust
Custody Services
Benefiting from the experience of dedicated custody specialists
U.S. Trust is the custodian of choice for many sophisticated investors with extensive and complex holdings. Whether you manage your own portfolio or work with multiple brokers and investment managers, we can structure a personalized custody program that simplifies portfolio and trade monitoring and helps meet your specific safekeeping, service and information needs.

Always consult with your independent attorney, tax advisor, investment manager and insurance agent for final recommendations and before changing or implementing any financial, tax or estate planning strategy.
Bank of America, N.A. and the U.S. Trust Company of Delaware (collectively the "Bank") do not serve in a fiduciary capacity with respect to all products or services. Fiduciary standards or fiduciary duties do not apply, for example, when the Bank is offering or providing credit solutions, banking, custody or brokerage products/services or referrals to other affiliates of the Bank.
AR-AR7F755H-EXP-2018.05.09






Videos:
 
The Role of a Fiduciary

 
Wealth Planning

 
Agent For Fiduciary

 
Eldercare Planning Services

 
Financial Empowerment

 
Private Philanthropy Services

View More Videos 





You Might Also Be Interested In:

Investment Management
Credit & Banking
Tax Planning
Family Wealth Services
THE FAMILY OFFICE DECISION
Philanthropy
Comprehensive Services For Auto Dealership Owners




























 Investment Management Wealth Structuring Credit & Banking Working with U.S. Trust Press Room 



 Capital Acumen Available on the iPhone App Store 


Connect With Us:


Phone Number
Twitter
LinkedIn
YouTube





 U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management Homepage






Investment products:  Are Not FDIC InsuredAre Not Bank GuaranteedMay Lose Value
Credit and collateral subject to approval. Terms and conditions apply. Programs, rates, terms and conditions subject to change without notice.
U.S. Trust, Bank of America Private Wealth Management operates through  Bank of America, N.A. and other subsidiaries of Bank of America Corporation.


Bank of America Home · Privacy & Security
Bank of America, N.A., Member FDIC. Equal Housing Lender 
©  Bank of America Corporation. All rights reserved.






42286FFD (JCF*******803)




   






	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads







































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































